Illinois, session 104th, HB4012.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Video Gaming Act is amended by changing 5Sections 27, 35, and 65 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 40/27)7    Sec. 27. Prohibition of video gaming by political 8subdivision. 9    (a) A municipality may pass an ordinance prohibiting video 10gaming within the corporate limits of the municipality. A 11county board may, for the unincorporated area of the county, 12pass an ordinance prohibiting video gaming within the 13unincorporated area of the county.14    (b) On and after July 1, 2022, a qualified fraternal 15organization that derives its charter from a national 16fraternal organization and a qualified veterans organization 17that derives its charter from a national veterans organization 18shall be eligible to apply to the Board for a license allowing 19video gaming as a licensed fraternal establishment or a 20licensed veterans establishment if the proposed fraternal 21establishment or veterans establishment is located in:22        (1) a municipality having a population of not more 23    than 1,000,000 that has enacted an ordinance prohibiting   HB4012- 2 -LRB104 12635 LNS 23324 b1    video gaming within the corporate limits; or2        (2) a county having a population of not more than 3    1,000,000 that has enacted an ordinance prohibiting video 4    gaming within the unincorporated area of the county.5    If the license is granted by the Board, then the licensed 6fraternal establishment or licensed veterans establishment may 7operate video gaming terminals pursuant to this Act.8    (c) No home rule unit of local government with a 9population of over 1,000,000, based on the 2000 U.S. Census, 10may enforce any local ordinance passed prior to the effective 11date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly 12prohibiting the operation of video gaming terminals within the 13corporate limits of the municipality. This subsection (c) is a 14denial and limitation of home rule powers and functions under 15subsection (g) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 16Constitution. 17(Source: P.A. 102-689, eff. 12-17-21.) 18    (230 ILCS 40/35)19    Sec. 35. Display of license; confiscation; violation as 20felony. 21    (a) Each video gaming terminal shall be licensed by the 22Board before placement or operation on the premises of a 23licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 24licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 25establishment, or licensed veterans establishment. The license   HB4012- 3 -LRB104 12635 LNS 23324 b1of each video gaming terminal shall be maintained at the 2location where the video gaming terminal is operated. Failure 3to do so is a petty offense with a fine not to exceed $100. Any 4licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 5licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 6establishment, or licensed veterans establishment used for the 7conduct of gambling games in violation of this Act shall be 8considered a gambling place in violation of Section 28-3 of 9the Criminal Code of 2012. Every gambling device found in a 10licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 11licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 12establishment, or licensed veterans establishment operating 13gambling games in violation of this Act shall be subject to 14seizure, confiscation, and destruction as provided in Section 1528-5 of the Criminal Code of 2012. Any license issued under the 16Liquor Control Act of 1934 to any owner or operator of a 17licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 18licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 19establishment, or licensed veterans establishment that 20operates or permits the operation of a video gaming terminal 21within its establishment in violation of this Act shall be 22immediately revoked. No person may own, operate, have in his 23or her possession or custody or under his or her control, or 24permit to be kept in any place under his or her possession or 25control, any device that awards credits and contains a 26circuit, meter, or switch capable of removing and recording   HB4012- 4 -LRB104 12635 LNS 23324 b1the removal of credits when the award of credits is dependent 2upon chance. 3    Nothing in this Section shall be deemed to prohibit the 4use of a game device only if the game device is used in an 5activity that is not gambling under subsection (b) of Section 628-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 7    A violation of this Section is a Class 4 felony. All 8devices that are owned, operated, or possessed in violation of 9this Section are hereby declared to be public nuisances and 10shall be subject to seizure, confiscation, and destruction as 11provided in Section 28-5 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 12    The provisions of this Section do not apply to devices or 13electronic video game terminals licensed pursuant to this Act. 14A video gaming terminal operated for amusement only and 15bearing a valid amusement tax sticker shall not be subject to 16this Section until 30 days after the Board establishes that 17the central communications system is functional. 18    (b) (1) The odds of winning each video game shall be posted 19on or near each video gaming terminal. The manner in which the 20odds are calculated and how they are posted shall be 21determined by the Board by rule.22    (2) No video gaming terminal licensed under this Act may 23be played except during the legal hours of operation allowed 24for the consumption of alcoholic beverages at the licensed 25establishment, licensed fraternal establishment, or licensed 26veterans establishment. A licensed establishment, licensed   HB4012- 5 -LRB104 12635 LNS 23324 b1fraternal establishment, or licensed veterans establishment 2that violates this subsection is subject to termination of its 3license by the Board. 4(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 5    (230 ILCS 40/65)6    Sec. 65. Fees.7    (a) A non-home rule unit of government may not impose any 8fee for the operation of a video gaming terminal in excess of 9$250 per year.10    (b) A home rule unit of government with a population of 11over 1,000,000, based on the 2000 U.S. Census, may not impose 12any fee for the operation of a video gaming terminal in excess 13of $250 per year. This subsection (b) is a denial and 14limitation of home rule powers and functions under subsection 15(g) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 16    (c) The cost of any fee imposed under subsections (a) and 17(b) of this Act by any home rule unit of government or non-home 18rule unit of government shall be shared equally between the 19terminal operator and the applicable licensed establishment, 20licensed veterans establishment, licensed truck stop 21establishment, licensed large truck stop establishment, or 22licensed fraternal establishment under this Act. This 23subsection (c) is a denial and limitation of home rule powers 24and functions under subsection (g) of Section 6 of Article VII 25of the Illinois Constitution.   HB4012- 6 -LRB104 12635 LNS 23324 b1(Source: P.A. 101-337, eff. 1-1-20; 102-689, eff. 12-17-21.) 2    Section 10. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 3changing Sections 28-1 and 28-2 as follows: 4    (720 ILCS 5/28-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-1)5    Sec. 28-1. Gambling. 6    (a) A person commits gambling when he or she:7        (1) knowingly plays a game of chance or skill for 8    money or other thing of value, unless excepted in 9    subsection (b) of this Section;10        (2) knowingly makes a wager upon the result of any 11    game, contest, or any political nomination, appointment or 12    election;13        (3) knowingly operates, keeps, owns, uses, purchases, 14    exhibits, rents, sells, bargains for the sale or lease of, 15    manufactures or distributes any gambling device;16        (4) contracts to have or give himself or herself or 17    another the option to buy or sell, or contracts to buy or 18    sell, at a future time, any grain or other commodity 19    whatsoever, or any stock or security of any company, where 20    it is at the time of making such contract intended by both 21    parties thereto that the contract to buy or sell, or the 22    option, whenever exercised, or the contract resulting 23    therefrom, shall be settled, not by the receipt or 24    delivery of such property, but by the payment only of   HB4012- 7 -LRB104 12635 LNS 23324 b1    differences in prices thereof; however, the issuance, 2    purchase, sale, exercise, endorsement or guarantee, by or 3    through a person registered with the Secretary of State 4    pursuant to Section 8 of the Illinois Securities Law of 5    1953, or by or through a person exempt from such 6    registration under said Section 8, of a put, call, or 7    other option to buy or sell securities which have been 8    registered with the Secretary of State or which are exempt 9    from such registration under Section 3 of the Illinois 10    Securities Law of 1953 is not gambling within the meaning 11    of this paragraph (4);12        (5) knowingly owns or possesses any book, instrument, 13    or apparatus by means of which bets or wagers have been, or 14    are, recorded or registered, or knowingly possesses any 15    money which he or she has received in the course of a bet 16    or wager;17        (6) knowingly sells pools upon the result of any game 18    or contest of skill or chance, political nomination, 19    appointment, or election;20        (7) knowingly sets up or promotes any lottery or 21    sells, offers to sell, or transfers any ticket or share 22    for any lottery;23        (8) knowingly sets up or promotes any policy game or 24    sells, offers to sell, or knowingly possesses or transfers 25    any policy ticket, slip, record, document, or other 26    similar device;  HB4012- 8 -LRB104 12635 LNS 23324 b1        (9) knowingly drafts, prints, or publishes any lottery 2    ticket or share, or any policy ticket, slip, record, 3    document, or similar device, except for such activity 4    related to lotteries, bingo games, and raffles authorized 5    by and conducted in accordance with the laws of Illinois 6    or any other state or foreign government;7        (10) knowingly advertises any lottery or policy game, 8    except for such activity related to lotteries, bingo 9    games, and raffles authorized by and conducted in 10    accordance with the laws of Illinois or any other state;11        (11) knowingly transmits information as to wagers, 12    betting odds, or changes in betting odds by telephone, 13    telegraph, radio, semaphore, or similar means; or 14    knowingly installs or maintains equipment for the 15    transmission or receipt of such information; except that 16    nothing in this subdivision (11) prohibits transmission or 17    receipt of such information for use in news reporting of 18    sporting events or contests; or19        (12) knowingly establishes, maintains, or operates an 20    Internet site that permits a person to play a game of 21    chance or skill for money or other thing of value by means 22    of the Internet or to make a wager upon the result of any 23    game, contest, political nomination, appointment, or 24    election by means of the Internet. This item (12) does not 25    apply to activities referenced in items (6), (6.1), (8), 26    (8.1), and (15) of subsection (b) of this Section.   HB4012- 9 -LRB104 12635 LNS 23324 b1    (b) Participants in any of the following activities shall 2not be convicted of gambling:3        (1) Agreements to compensate for loss caused by the 4    happening of chance, including, without limitation, 5    contracts of indemnity or guaranty and life or health or 6    accident insurance.7        (2) Offers of prizes, award, or compensation to the 8    actual contestants in any bona fide contest for the 9    determination of skill, speed, strength, or endurance or 10    to the owners of animals or vehicles entered in such 11    contest.12        (3) Pari-mutuel betting as authorized by the law of 13    this State.14        (4) Manufacture of gambling devices, including the 15    acquisition of essential parts therefor and the assembly 16    thereof, for transportation in interstate or foreign 17    commerce to any place outside this State when such 18    transportation is not prohibited by any applicable Federal 19    law; or the manufacture, distribution, or possession of 20    video gaming terminals, as defined in the Video Gaming 21    Act, by manufacturers, distributors, and terminal 22    operators licensed to do so under the Video Gaming Act.23        (5) The game commonly known as "bingo", when conducted 24    in accordance with the Bingo License and Tax Act.25        (6) Lotteries when conducted by the State of Illinois 26    in accordance with the Illinois Lottery Law. This   HB4012- 10 -LRB104 12635 LNS 23324 b1    exemption includes any activity conducted by the 2    Department of Revenue to sell lottery tickets pursuant to 3    the provisions of the Illinois Lottery Law and its rules.4        (6.1) The purchase of lottery tickets through the 5    Internet for a lottery conducted by the State of Illinois 6    under the program established in Section 7.12 of the 7    Illinois Lottery Law. 8        (7) Possession of an antique slot machine that is 9    neither used nor intended to be used in the operation or 10    promotion of any unlawful gambling activity or enterprise. 11    For the purpose of this subparagraph (b)(7), an antique 12    slot machine is one manufactured 25 years ago or earlier.13        (8) Raffles and poker runs when conducted in 14    accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs Act.15        (8.1) The purchase of raffle chances for a raffle 16    conducted in accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs 17    Act. 18        (9) Charitable games when conducted in accordance with 19    the Charitable Games Act.20        (10) Pull tabs and jar games when conducted under the 21    Illinois Pull Tabs and Jar Games Act.22        (11) Gambling games when authorized by the Illinois 23    Gambling Act.24        (12) Video gaming terminal games at a licensed 25    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 26    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal   HB4012- 11 -LRB104 12635 LNS 23324 b1    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment when 2    conducted in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 3        (13) Games of skill or chance where money or other 4    things of value can be won but no payment or purchase is 5    required to participate, except where participation in 6    such game of skill or chance is accomplished using a 7    gambling device prohibited by item (iii) of subsection (a) 8    of Section 28-2. 9        (14) Savings promotion raffles authorized under 10    Section 5g of the Illinois Banking Act, Section 7008 of 11    the Savings Bank Act, Section 42.7 of the Illinois Credit 12    Union Act, Section 5136B of the National Bank Act (12 13    U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home Owners' Loan Act (12 14    U.S.C. 1463). 15        (15) Sports wagering when conducted in accordance with 16    the Sports Wagering Act. 17    (c) Sentence.18        (1) Gambling is a Class A misdemeanor. A second or 19    subsequent conviction under subsections (a)(3) through 20    (a)(12), is a Class 4 felony.21        (2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection 22    (c), or anything else contained in this Section to the 23    contrary, a gambling offense involving a device described 24    in item (iii) of subsection (a) of Section 28-2 is a Class 25    4 felony. 26    (d) Circumstantial evidence.  HB4012- 12 -LRB104 12635 LNS 23324 b1    In prosecutions under this Section circumstantial evidence 2shall have the same validity and weight as in any criminal 3prosecution.4(Source: P.A. 101-31, Article 25, Section 25-915, eff. 56-28-19; 101-31, Article 35, Section 35-80, eff. 6-28-19; 6101-109, eff. 7-19-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 7    (720 ILCS 5/28-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-2)8    Sec. 28-2. Definitions. 9    (a) A "gambling device" is: (i) any clock, tape machine, 10slot machine, or other machines or device for the reception of 11money or other thing of value on chance or skill or upon the 12action of which money or other thing of value is staked, 13hazarded, bet, won, or lost; (ii) or any mechanism, furniture, 14fixture, equipment, or other device designed primarily for use 15in a gambling place; or (iii) any vending or other electronic 16machine or device, including, without limitation, a machine or 17device that awards credits and contains a circuit, meter, or 18switch capable of removing and recording the removal of 19credits that offers a person entry into any contest, 20competition, sweepstakes, scheme, plan, or other selection 21process that involves or is dependent upon an element of 22chance for which the person may receive a gift, award, or other 23item or service of value if that offer is incidental to or 24results from: (A) the purchase of an item or service of value; 25or (B) the purchase or gratuitous receipt of a coupon,   HB4012- 13 -LRB104 12635 LNS 23324 b1voucher, certificate, or other similar credit that can be 2redeemed for or applied towards an item or service of value 3from such machine or device or elsewhere. A "gambling device" 4does not include:5        (1) A coin-in-the-slot operated mechanical device 6    played for amusement which rewards the player with the 7    right to replay such mechanical device, which device is so 8    constructed or devised as to make such result of the 9    operation thereof depend in part upon the skill of the 10    player and which returns to the player thereof no money, 11    property, or right to receive money or property.12        (2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection 13    (a), a vending machine Vending machines by which full and 14    adequate return is made for the money invested and in 15    which there is no element of chance or hazard.16        (3) A crane game. For the purposes of this paragraph 17    (3), a "crane game" is an amusement device involving 18    skill, if it rewards the player exclusively with 19    merchandise contained within the amusement device proper 20    and limited to toys, novelties, and prizes other than 21    currency, each having a wholesale value which is not more 22    than $25.23        (4) A redemption machine. For the purposes of this 24    paragraph (4), a "redemption machine" is a single-player 25    or multi-player amusement device involving a game, the 26    object of which is throwing, rolling, bowling, shooting,   HB4012- 14 -LRB104 12635 LNS 23324 b1    placing, or propelling a ball or other object that is 2    either physical or computer generated on a display or with 3    lights into, upon, or against a hole or other target that 4    is either physical or computer generated on a display or 5    with lights, or stopping, by physical, mechanical, or 6    electronic means, a moving object that is either physical 7    or computer generated on a display or with lights into, 8    upon, or against a hole or other target that is either 9    physical or computer generated on a display or with 10    lights, provided that all of the following conditions are 11    met:12            (A) The outcome of the game is predominantly 13        determined by the skill of the player.14            (B) The award of the prize is based solely upon the 15        player's achieving the object of the game or otherwise 16        upon the player's score.17            (C) Only merchandise prizes are awarded.18            (D) The wholesale value of prizes awarded in lieu 19        of tickets or tokens for single play of the device does 20        not exceed $25.21            (E) The redemption value of tickets, tokens, and 22        other representations of value, which may be 23        accumulated by players to redeem prizes of greater 24        value, for a single play of the device does not exceed 25        $25.26        (5) Video gaming terminals at a licensed   HB4012- 15 -LRB104 12635 LNS 23324 b1    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 2    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 3    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment licensed 4    in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 5    (a-5) "Internet" means an interactive computer service or 6system or an information service, system, or access software 7provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple 8users to a computer server, and includes, but is not limited 9to, an information service, system, or access software 10provider that provides access to a network system commonly 11known as the Internet, or any comparable system or service and 12also includes, but is not limited to, a World Wide Web page, 13newsgroup, message board, mailing list, or chat area on any 14interactive computer service or system or other online 15service.16    (a-6) "Access" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 17Section 17-55.18    (a-7) "Computer" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 19Section 17-0.5. 20    (b) A "lottery" is any scheme or procedure whereby one or 21more prizes are distributed by chance among persons who have 22paid or promised consideration for a chance to win such 23prizes, whether such scheme or procedure is called a lottery, 24raffle, gift, sale, or some other name, excluding savings 25promotion raffles authorized under Section 5g of the Illinois 26Banking Act, Section 7008 of the Savings Bank Act, Section   HB4012- 16 -LRB104 12635 LNS 23324 b142.7 of the Illinois Credit Union Act, Section 5136B of the 2National Bank Act (12 U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home 3Owners' Loan Act (12 U.S.C. 1463).4    (c) A "policy game" is any scheme or procedure whereby a 5person promises or guarantees by any instrument, bill, 6certificate, writing, token, or other device that any 7particular number, character, ticket, or certificate shall in 8the event of any contingency in the nature of a lottery entitle 9the purchaser or holder to receive money, property, or 10evidence of debt.11    (d) It is the intent of item (iii) of subsection (a) of 12this Section to prohibit any mechanism that seeks to avoid 13being considered a gambling device through the use of any 14subterfuge or pretense whatsoever. 15(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-87, eff. 1-1-20; 16102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.